New Jersey, session 221, S748.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Police officers employed in the Division of Administration and Public Safety of Rutgers, the State University, shall be in the career service of the civil service and subject to the provisions of Title 11A of the New Jersey Statues (Civil Service). Any such public officer who has been employed for at least one year prior to the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall have permanent career status with seniority awarded from the date of appointment. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the third month following the date of enactment.